Arkansas, session 2025, SB321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-10-310(c)(1)(A), concerning the priority
of allocations if the State Administration of Justice Fund balance is
inadequate to fully fund all authorized monthly allocations, is amended to
read as follows:
(1)(A) The available revenue and remaining State Administration
of Justice Fund balance shall be distributed first to fully fund the monthly
allocation for:
(i) The Court Reporter's Fund;
(ii) The Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc., for
the Executive Director of the Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc.; and
(iii) The Administrative Office of the Courts to fund
the Trial Court Administrator Fund; and
(iii) The Administrative Office of the Courts for
county reimbursements for jurors.



*CEB125*
02/25/2025 4:35:57 PM CEB125